Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that over 500,000 women in the United States are at risk of or have undergone female genital mutilation, including 25,000 women and girls in Washington state. The legislature further finds that the Seattle-Tacoma-Bellevue metro is among the five highest rates of impacted and at-risk communities in the United States, making addressing female genital mutilation and other sexual violence critical.It is the intent of the legislature to expand the rights of survivors of sexual assault to survivors of all acts of sexual violence, including female genital mutilation. The legislature further intends to extend the life cycle of the SAFE advisory group and expand its duties to include researching and making recommendations on trauma-informed, culturally sensitive policies to prevent and address female genital mutilation and other acts of sexual violence.The legislature declares that protection of victim witnesses in sexual assault and domestic violence cases is a substantial and compelling interest of the state. Sexual assault and domestic violence cases are some of the most difficult cases to prosecute. When sexual assault and domestic violence cases are prosecuted, a victim witness may suffer serious emotional and mental trauma from exposure to the defendant or from testifying in open court. In rare cases, the victim witness is so traumatized that the victim witness is unable to testify at trial and is unavailable as a witness, or the victim witness's ability to communicate in front of the defendant is so reduced that the truth-seeking function of trial is impaired. In other rare cases, the victim witness is able to proceed to trial but suffers long-lasting trauma as a result of testifying in court or in front of the defendant. This trauma is further exacerbated when questioned by a pro se defendant. A pro se defendant's unfettered access to the victim of sexual assault or domestic violence continues the psychological trauma inflicted upon the victim. The creation of procedural processes designed to enhance the truth-seeking process and to shield victim witnesses from the trauma of exposure to the defendant and the courtroom is a compelling state interest.The legislature further declares that it intends to protect victim witnesses in sexual assault and domestic violence cases while upholding the rights of defendants under Faretta v. California, 422 U.S. 806 (1975),the Sixth Amendment to the federal Constitution, and Article I, section 22 of the state Constitution, by applying the balancing test for testimony of children witnesses by closed-circuit television in State v. Foster, 135 Wn.2d 441, 957 P.2d 712 (1998) to such victim witnesses. The legislature finds that applying the balancing test in State v. Foster when permitting the court to conduct, or appoint the use of standby counsel to conduct, all examination of victim witnesses on behalf of the pro se defendant in sexual assault and domestic violence cases is necessary to further the substantial and compelling state interest in protecting the welfare of the particular victim witness, would assure the reliability of the testimony of such a victim witness, and ensure that a defendant's Faretta rights are not infringed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 7.69 RCW to read as follows:(1) On motion of the prosecuting attorney in any criminal proceeding involving sexual assault or domestic violence in which the defendant is proceeding pro se, whether or not the motion is at the request of the victim witness, the court may conduct, or appoint standby counsel to conduct, all examination of the victim witness on behalf of the pro se defendant during trial if:(a) The testimony will:(i) Describe an act or attempted act of sexual contact or sexual assault performed with or on the victim witness by another person; or(ii) Describe an act or attempted act of domestic violence against the victim witness by another person;(b) The testimony is taken during a criminal proceeding;(c) The court finds by substantial evidence, in a hearing conducted outside the presence of the jury, that:(i) The victim witness involved would be traumatized;(ii) The source of the trauma is not the courtroom generally, but the presence of the defendant; and(iii) The emotional or mental distress suffered by the victim witness would be more than de minimis;(d) The court finds that the prosecutor has made all reasonable efforts to prepare the victim witness for testifying. If the prosecutor fails to demonstrate the preparations were implemented or the prosecutor in good faith attempted to implement them, the court shall deny the motion;(e) The court balances the strength of the state's case without the testimony of the victim witness against the defendant's constitutional rights and the degree of infringement of having standby counsel or the court inquire of the witness;(f) The court finds that no less restrictive method of obtaining the testimony exists that can adequately protect the victim witness from suffering emotional or mental distress that was more than de minimis; and(g) When the court conducts, or appoints standby counsel to conduct, all examination of the victim witness on behalf of the pro se defendant, the pro se defendant shall have the opportunity to write additional questions and have such questions asked if appropriate under the applicable evidentiary rules and case law. Reasonable court recesses must be granted to facilitate the pro se defendant's ability to meaningfully cross-examine a witness through standby counsel or the court.(2) During the hearing conducted under subsection (1) of this section to determine if the court will conduct, or appoint standby counsel to conduct, all examination of a victim witness on behalf of the pro se defendant, the court may conduct the observation and examination of the victim upon request of the prosecutor. The pro se defendant shall have an opportunity to oppose the prosecutor's request to have standby counsel or the court conduct all examination on behalf of the pro se defendant. The pro se defendant may not have the opportunity to question the victim witness face-to-face at this hearing but may present arguments supporting the defendant's opposition.(3) On motion of the prosecuting attorney in any criminal proceeding involving sexual assault or domestic violence in which the defendant is proceeding pro se, whether or not the motion is at the request of the victim witness, the court may appoint standby counsel or an investigator to conduct all examination of the victim witness on behalf of the pro se defendant during trial preparation if:(a) The anticipated testimony will:(i) Describe an act or attempted act of sexual contact or sexual assault performed with or on the victim witness by another person; or(ii) Describe an act or attempted act of domestic violence against the victim witness by another person; and(b) The anticipated testimony is taken for the purposes of preparing for a criminal proceeding.(4) The court shall make particularized findings on the record articulating the factors upon which the court based its decision to appoint standby counsel to conduct, appoint an investigator to conduct, or have the court itself conduct all examination of the victim witness on behalf of the pro se defendant pursuant to this section. The factors the court may consider include, but are not limited to, consideration of: The victim witness's age, physical health, emotional stability, expressions of fear of being examined in open court by the defendant, and expressions of fear of being examined by the defendant during trial preparation; the relationship of the defendant to the victim witness; the nature of the underlying offense and the traumatization the victim witness will experience from being examined by the defendant; the victim witness's ability to testify in front of the defendant; and the specific nature or emotional or mental trauma the victim witness will suffer. The court's findings shall identify the impact the factors have upon the victim witness's ability to testify in front of the defendant and the specific nature of the emotional or mental trauma the victim witness would suffer. The court shall determine whether the source of the trauma is the defendant and may conduct, appoint standby counsel to conduct, or appoint an investigator to conduct, all examination of the victim witness on behalf of the pro se defendant pursuant to this section.(5) As used in this section:(a) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.125.030.(b) "Sexual contact" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.44.010.(c) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as in RCW 10.99.020.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 7.69 RCW to read as follows:Any minor age 13 years or older may consent to a forensic examination conducted for the purposes of gathering evidence for possible prosecution for domestic violence assault involving nonfatal strangulation.Sec. 4. RCW 70.125.030 and 2012 c 29 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Community sexual assault program" means a community-based social service agency that is qualified to provide and provides core services to victims of sexual assault.(2) "Core services" means those services that are victim-centered community-based advocacy responses to alleviate the impact of sexual assault, as delineated in the Washington state sexual assault services plan of 1995 and its subsequent revisions.(3) "Department" means the department of commerce.(4) "Female genital mutilation" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.36.175.(5) "Law enforcement agencies" means police and sheriff's departments and tribal law enforcement departments or agencies of this state.(((5)))(6) "Personal representative" means a friend, relative, attorney, or employee or volunteer from a community sexual assault program or specialized treatment service provider.(((6)))(7) "Services for underserved populations" means culturally relevant victim-centered community-based advocacy responses to alleviate the impact of sexual assault, as delineated in the Washington state sexual assault services plan of 1995 and its subsequent revisions.(((7)))(8) "Sexual assault" means one or more of the following:(a) Rape or rape of a child;(b) Assault with intent to commit rape or rape of a child;(c) Incest or indecent liberties;(d) Child molestation;(e) Sexual misconduct with a minor;(f) Custodial sexual misconduct;(g) Crimes with a sexual motivation;(h) Sexual exploitation or commercial sex abuse of a minor;(i) Promoting prostitution; or(j) An attempt to commit any of the aforementioned offenses.(((8)))(9) "Specialized services" means those services intended to alleviate the impact of sexual assault, as delineated in the Washington state sexual assault services plan of 1995 and its subsequent revisions.(((9)))(10) "Victim" means any person who suffers physical, emotional, financial, and psychological impact as a proximate result of a sexual assault.Sec. 5. RCW 70.125.110 and 2025 c 124 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In addition to all other rights provided in law, a sexual ((assault))violence survivor has the right to:(a) Receive a medical forensic examination at no cost;(b) Receive written notice of the right under (a) of this subsection and that he or she may be eligible for other benefits under the crime victim compensation program, through a form developed by the office of crime victims advocacy, from the medical facility providing the survivor medical treatment relating to the sexual assault;(c) Receive a referral to an accredited community sexual assault program or, in the case of a survivor who is a minor, receive a connection to services in accordance with the county child sexual abuse investigation protocol under RCW 26.44.180, which may include a referral to a children's advocacy center, when presenting at a medical facility for medical treatment relating to the assault and also when reporting the assault to a law enforcement officer;(d) Consult with a sexual ((assault))violence survivor's advocate throughout the investigatory process and prosecution of the survivor's case, including during: Any medical evidentiary examination at a medical facility; any interview by law enforcement officers, prosecuting attorneys, or defense attorneys; and court proceedings, except while providing testimony in a criminal trial, in which case the advocate may be present in the courtroom. Medical facilities, law enforcement officers, prosecuting attorneys, defense attorneys, courts and other applicable criminal justice agencies, including correctional facilities, are responsible for providing advocates access to facilities where necessary to fulfill the requirements under this subsection. The right in this subsection applies regardless of whether a survivor has waived the right in a previous examination or interview;(e) Be informed in writing of policies governing the collection and preservation of a sexual assault kit;(f) Be informed, upon the request of a survivor, of when the forensic analysis of his or her sexual assault kit and other related physical evidence will be or was completed, the results of the forensic analysis, and whether the analysis yielded a DNA profile and match, provided that the disclosure is made at an appropriate time so as to not impede or compromise an ongoing investigation;(g) Upon written request of a survivor, be granted further preservation of his or her sexual assault kit or its probative contents, without charge;(h) Upon written request of a survivor, receive written notification from the appropriate official with custody of his or her sexual assault kit not later than 60 days before the date of the intended destruction or disposal of his or her sexual assault kit;(i) Receive a copy of the police report related to the investigation without charge;(j) Review his or her statement before law enforcement refers a case to the prosecuting attorney;(k) Receive timely notifications from the law enforcement agency and prosecuting attorney as to the status of the investigation and any related prosecution of the survivor's case;(l) Be informed by the law enforcement agency and prosecuting attorney as to the expected and appropriate time frames for receiving responses to the survivor's inquiries regarding the status of the investigation and any related prosecution of the survivor's case; and further, receive responses to the survivor's inquiries in a manner consistent with those time frames;(m) Access interpreter services where necessary to facilitate communication throughout the investigatory process and prosecution of the survivor's case; and(n) Where the sexual ((assault))violence survivor is a minor, have:(i) The prosecutor consider and discuss the survivor's requests for remote video testimony under RCW 9A.44.150 when appropriate; and(ii) The court consider requests from the prosecutor for safeguarding the survivor's feelings of security and safety in the courtroom in order to facilitate the survivor's testimony and participation in the criminal justice process.(2) A sexual ((assault))violence survivor retains all the rights of this section regardless of whether the survivor agrees to participate in the criminal justice system and regardless of whether the survivor agrees to receive a forensic examination to collect evidence.(3) If a survivor is denied any right enumerated in subsection (1) of this section, he or she may seek an order directing compliance by the relevant party or parties by filing a petition in the superior court in the county in which the sexual assault occurred and providing notice of such petition to the relevant party or parties. Compliance with the right is the sole remedy available to the survivor. The court shall expedite consideration of a petition filed under this subsection.(4) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to provide grounds for error in favor of a criminal defendant in a criminal proceeding. Except in the circumstances as provided in subsection (3) of this section, this section does not grant a new cause of action or remedy against the state, its political subdivisions, law enforcement agencies, or prosecuting attorneys. The failure of a person to make a reasonable effort to protect or adhere to the rights enumerated in this section may not result in civil liability against that person. This section does not limit other civil remedies or defenses of the sexual ((assault))violence survivor or the offender.(5) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Law enforcement officer" means a general authority Washington peace officer, as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or any person employed by a private police agency at a public school as described in RCW 28A.150.010 or an institution of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.(b) "Sexual ((assault))violence survivor" means any person who is a victim, as defined in RCW 7.69.020, of sexual assault or female genital mutilation. However, if a victim is incapacitated, deceased, or a minor, sexual ((assault))violence survivor also includes any lawful representative of the victim, including a parent, guardian, spouse, or other designated representative, unless the person is an alleged perpetrator or suspect.(c) "Sexual ((assault))violence survivor's advocate" means any person who is defined in RCW 5.60.060 as a sexual assault advocate, or a crime victim advocate.Sec. 6. RCW 43.10.801 and 2023 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The ((sexual assault forensic examination best practices))SAFE advisory group is established within the office of the attorney general for the purpose of ((reviewing best practice models for managing all aspects of sexual assault investigations and for reducing the number of untested sexual assault kits in Washington state))recommending actionable, trauma-informed, victim-centered policies related to preventing and addressing sexual violence.(i) The caucus leaders from the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.(ii) The caucus leaders from the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.(iii) The attorney general, in consultation with the legislative members of the advisory group, shall appoint:(A) One member representing each of the following:(I) The Washington state patrol;(II) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;(III) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;(IV) The Washington defender association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;(V) The Washington association of cities;(VI) The Washington association of county officials or the Washington state association of counties;(VII) The ((Washington coalition of sexual assault programs))designated statewide sexual assault coalition;(VIII) The office of crime victims advocacy;(IX) The Washington state hospital association;(X) The office of the attorney general; and(XI) The criminal justice training commission;(B) ((Two))Three members representing survivors of sexual ((assault))violence;(C) One member who is a sexual assault ((nurse))forensic examiner;(D) Two members who are law enforcement officers, one from a rural area and one from an urban area of the state;(E) One member who is a prosecuting attorney serving in a county in a rural area of the state; ((and))(F) Two members who are community-based advocates, one from a rural area and one from an urban area of the state; and(G) One member representing children's advocacy centers.(b) When appointing members under (a)(iii)(D) of this subsection, the office of the attorney general shall solicit recommendations from statewide labor organizations representing law enforcement officers.(2) The duties of the advisory group include, but are not limited to:(a) Researching ((the))and advancing best practice models both in state and from other states for collaborative responses to victims of sexual ((assault from the point the sexual assault kit is collected to the conclusion of the))violence related to accessing medical forensic examinations and community-based support services, enhancing investigation and prosecution of a case, and providing recommendations regarding any existing gaps in Washington and resources that may be necessary to address those gaps;(b) Researching and making recommendations on opportunities to increase access to, and availability of, critical sexual assault ((nurse))forensic examiner services and enhancing statewide coordination of forensic services;(c) Monitoring the testing ((of the backlog of sexual assault kits and the supply chain and distribution)), supply chain, and distribution of sexual assault and nonfatal strangulation evidence collection kits;(d) Monitoring implementation of state and federal legislative changes;(e) Collaborating with the legislature, state agencies, medical facilities, and local governments to implement reforms ((pursuant to federal grant requirements)); and(f) Making recommendations for institutional reforms necessary to prevent sexual ((assault))violence and improve the experiences of ((sexual assault)) survivors in the criminal justice system, with special focus on, but not limited to, Black, indigenous, and other populations disproportionately impacted by sexual violence.(3) The office of the attorney general shall administer and provide staff support to the advisory group.(4) Legislative members of the advisory group must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(5) The advisory group must meet no less than twice annually.(6) The advisory group shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by December 15th of each year.(7) This section expires July 1, ((2026))2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---